Hawaii statutes.
§54-22 Revenue bond sales. The county
treasurer shall, when so directed by the board of water supply, sell such bonds
as may be authorized for the acquisition, construction, replacement, extension,
or completion of the waterworks; provided that the sale shall otherwise be
conducted in accordance with the procedure specified by the law for the sale of
the bonds. The proceeds from the sales shall be kept by the county treasurer
in a separate fund to be used only for the purposes for which the bonds were sold.
[L 1961, c 155, pt of §1; Supp, §145A-12; HRS §54-22]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next